Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,237
Out-of-state retailers; collect and remit sales tax; Department of Revenue; duties.

If the federal government passes a law that expands the state's authority to require out-of-state retailers to collect and remit the tax imposed under section 77-2703 on purchases by Nebraska residents and the state collects additional revenue under section 77-2703 as a result of such federal law, then the Department of Revenue shall determine the amount of such additional revenue collected during the first twelve months following the date on which the state begins collecting such additional revenue. The department shall certify such amount to the Governor, the Legislature, and the State Treasurer, and the certified amount shall be used for purposes of subdivision (2)(d) of section 77-27,132. This section terminates three years after August 30, 2015.

Laws 2015, LB200, § 1.